Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-434
Violations; penalty; prosecution.

(1) Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 48-425 to 48-432 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

(2) All prosecutions for offenses relating to health and safety laws and regulations under sections 48-401 to 48-435 shall be brought in the name of the State of Nebraska before any court having jurisdiction thereof. It shall be the duty of all county attorneys in their respective counties to prosecute all persons charged with offenses against the health and safety laws and regulations of this state.

Laws 1911, c. 65, § 10, p. 295;

R.S.1913, § 3611;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 30, p. 566;

C.S.1922, § 7711;

C.S.1929, § 48-430;

R.S.1943, § 48-434;

Laws 1969, c. 400, § 6, p. 1393;

Laws 1973, LB 2, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 286.

Effect of 1919 amendment to this section discussed. Quist v. Duda, 159 Neb. 393, 67 N.W.2d 481 (1954).